Utah statutes.
63E-1-201.   Retirement and Independent Entities Committee creation.
(1)  There is created the Retirement and Independent Entities Committee
composed of 15 legislators appointed as follows:
(a)  six senators, appointed by the president of the Senate, with at least two
senators from the minority party; and
(b)  nine representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives, with at least three representatives from the minority party.
(2) (a)  The president of the Senate shall designate one of the Senate
appointees as a cochair of the committee.
(b)  The speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate one of the
House of Representatives appointees as a cochair of the committee.
(3)  Committee members serve for two years, but may be reappointed by the
speaker or the president.
(4)  The committee shall meet at least twice each year, but may meet more
frequently if the chairs determine that additional meetings are needed.
(5)  In conducting all of its business, the committee shall comply with the
rules of legislative interim committees.
(6)  The Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel shall provide
staff services to the committee.
(7)  Salaries and expenses of legislative committee members shall be paid in
accordance with:
(a)  Section 36-2-2; and
(b)  Legislative Joint Rule 15.03.
